Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-677
Withdrawal of ground water for industrial purposes; permit required; when.

(1) Except as provided in sections 46-676.01 and 46-678.01:

(a) Any person who desires to withdraw and transfer ground water from aquifers located within the State of Nebraska for industrial purposes shall, prior to commencing construction of any water wells, obtain from the Chief Water Officer a permit to authorize such withdrawal and transfer of such ground water; and

(b) Any person who prior to April 23, 1993, has withdrawn ground water from aquifers located in the State of Nebraska for industrial purposes may file an application for a permit to authorize the transfer of such ground water at any time.

(2) For purposes of this section, industrial purposes includes manufacturing, commercial, and power generation uses of water and commercial use includes, but is not limited to, maintenance of the turf of a golf course.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 34;

Laws 1993, LB 789, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 458, § 5;

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 76;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 191.